Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska87-303.07
Sale or lease agreement; unenforceable; when.

If a buyer or lessee is induced by a violation of section 87-302 or 87-303.01 to enter into a sale or lease, the agreement is unenforceable by the seller or lessor and the buyer or lessee, at his or her option, may rescind the agreement or retain the merchandise delivered and the benefit of any services performed without any obligation to pay for them.

Laws 1974, LB 327, § 9;

Laws 2008, LB781, § 8.